District of Columbia statutes.
39-405

Report to Council.

Within 45 days after the end of each fiscal year, the Mayor shall submit to the Council a report that states in detail the amount of economic assistance provided under this chapter during the preceding fiscal year, and names the recipients of the economic assistance and their uses of that assistance.

Apr. 5, 2005, D.C. Law 15-271, § 6, 52 DCR 820